Hawaii statutes.
§17-1 United States senator. When a
vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator, the vacancy shall be
filled for the unexpired term at the following state general election; provided
that the vacancy occurs not later than 4:30 p.m. on the twenty-first day prior
to the date specified in section 12-6 for the close of filing nomination papers
for regularly scheduled elections; otherwise at the state general election next
following. The chief election officer shall issue a proclamation designating the
election for filling the vacancy. All candidates for the unexpired term shall
file nomination papers not later than the date and time specified in section 12‑6
and shall be nominated and elected in accordance with this title. Pending the
election, the governor shall make a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy
by selecting a person from a list of three prospective appointees submitted by
the same political party as the prior incumbent. The appointee shall serve
until the election and qualification of the person duly elected to fill the
vacancy and shall be, at the time of appointment, and shall have been, for at
least six months immediately prior to the appointment, a member of the same
political party as the prior incumbent. The appointee shall be a resident of
the State. If the prior incumbent was not a member of any political party, the
governor shall appoint a person who is not and has not been, for at least six
months immediately prior to the appointment, a member of any political party. [L
1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §7(a); am L 2007, c 57, §2; am L 2015,
c 179, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next